Utah statutes.
58-16a-905.   Manufacturers' conduct.
Nothing in Section 58-16a-904 is intended to require a manufacturer to:
(1)  sell to a competitor;
(2)  sell contact lenses to different contact lens distributors or customers
at the same price;
(3)  open or maintain any account for a contact lens seller who is not in
substantial compliance with Utah and federal law regarding the sale of contact
lenses;
(4)  decide whether a low volume account with a contact lens seller is a
direct account or handled through a distributor; or
(5)  sell to customers in all geographic areas lenses that are being test
marketed on a limited basis in one geographic area.
